Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Chapter 4 Uniform Interstate Family Support Act

Cross references. —

As to petition by wife for support, see §

20-2-102

.

As to desertion of wife or children, see chapter 3 of this title.

As to wage earner's exemption from garnishment, see §

1-15-408

.

Editor's notes. —

The Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, §§

20-4-101

through 20-4-138, was repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 148 § 3, and replaced by the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, §§

20-4-139

through

20-4-194

.

Denial of visitation rights not change in circumstances. —

The denial of visitation rights by either the custodial parent or the child does not constitute a change in circumstances justifying the reduction or termination of the noncustodial parent's support obligation. A child's need for support and a parent's ability to pay are not related to questions concerning visitation. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Lack of visitation and negative feelings not to be considered. —

Lack of visitation and negative feelings between a noncustodial parent and child are not proper factors that a court may consider in determining whether to deviate from the presumptive support guidelines; such consideration is, therefore, an abuse of discretion. Sharpe v. Sharpe, 902 P.2d 210,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Uniform Enforcement of Support Act in Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 237.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Desertion and Nonsupport §§ 72 to 83.

Construction and application of state statutes providing for reciprocal enforcement of duty to support dependents, 42 ALR2d 768.

Obtaining jurisdiction over nonresident parent in filiation or support proceeding, 76 ALR3d 708.

Determination of paternity of child as within scope of proceeding under Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, 81 ALR3d 1175.

Wife's liability for necessaries furnished husband, 11 ALR4th 1160.

Authority of court, upon entering default judgment, to make orders for child custody or support which were not specifically requested in pleadings of prevailing party, 5 ALR5th 863.